Utah statutes.
75-3-812.   Execution and levies prohibited.
No execution may issue upon nor may any levy be made against any property of
the estate under any judgment against a decedent or a personal representative,
but this section shall not be construed to prevent the enforcement of
mortgages, pledges, or liens upon real or personal property in an appropriate
proceeding.
